District of Columbia statutes.
26-551.15

Modification or rescission of orders.

The Commissioner may modify or rescind a final order issued under § 26-551.13 after receiving and considering a request from a financial institution, a financial institution’s affiliate or subsidiary, or any other party to the investigatory proceeding, if the Commissioner determines that:

(1)

It is in the public interest to modify or rescind the final order; and

(2)

It is reasonable to believe that the financial institution, the financial institution’s affiliate or subsidiary, or the other party to the investigatory proceeding will engage in safe and sound practices and will comply with the District of Columbia Banking Code.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 115, 48 DCR 3244